Tennessee statutes. Title 35 Fiduciaries And Trust Estates
Part 4

Creation, Validity, Modification, and Termination of Trust

35-15-401. Methods of creating trust.

A trust may be created by:

The transfer of property to another person as trustee during the settlor's lifetime or by will or other disposition taking effect upon the settlor's death;

The declaration by the owner of property that the owner holds identifiable property as trustee;

The exercise of a power of appointment in favor of a trustee; or

A court pursuant to its statutory or equitable powers.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 23.

35-15-402. Requirements for creation.

A trust is created only if:

The settlor has capacity to create a trust;

The settlor indicates an intention to create the trust;

The trust has a definite beneficiary or is:

A charitable trust;

A trust for the care of an animal, as provided in § 35-15-408; or

A trust for a noncharitable purpose, as provided in § 35-15-409;

The trustee has duties to perform; and

The same person is not the sole trustee and sole beneficiary.

A beneficiary is definite if the beneficiary can be ascertained now or in the future, subject to any applicable rule against perpetuities.

A power in a trustee to select a beneficiary from an indefinite class is valid. If the power is not exercised within a reasonable time, the power fails and the property subject to the power passes to the persons who would have taken the property had the power not been conferred.

A lifetime trust is valid as to any assets held by the trust to the extent the assets have been transferred to the trust. For purposes of this subsection (d):

Assets capable of registration, such as real estate, stocks, bonds, bank and brokerage accounts, and the like, are transferred to the trust through the recording of the deed or the completion of registration of the asset in the name of the trust or trustee. Assets that are capable of registration are not transferred to the trust through only a recital of assignment, holding, or receipt in the trust instrument; and

Assets not capable of registration, are transferred to the trust through a recital of assignment describing the asset with particularity in the trust instrument.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 24; 2017, ch. 290, § 13.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment added (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 290, § 16. July 1, 2017.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence. 6 Tenn. Juris., Charities, § 5.

35-15-403. Trusts created in other jurisdictions.

A trust not created by will is validly created if its creation complies with the law of the jurisdiction in which the trust instrument was executed, or the law of the jurisdiction in which, at the time of creation:

The settlor was domiciled, had a place of abode, or was a national;

A trustee was domiciled or had a place of business; or

Any trust property was located.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 25.

35-15-404. Trust purposes.

A trust may be created only to the extent its purposes are lawful and possible to achieve. A trust and its terms must be for the benefit of its beneficiaries as the interests of such beneficiaries are defined under the terms of the trust.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 26; 2013, ch. 390, § 50.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 390, § 55 provided that: (b) Except as otherwise provided in the act, on July 1, 2013:

The act applies to all trusts created before, on, or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to all judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced on or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced before July 1, 2013, unless the court finds that application of a particular provision of the act would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceedings or prejudice the rights of the parties, in which case the particular provision of the act does not apply and the superseded law applies;

Any rule of construction or presumption provided in the act applies to trust instruments executed before July 1, 2013, unless there is a clear and express indication of a contrary intent in the terms of the trust; and

An act done before July 1, 2013, is not affected by the act.

Section Comment.

Unless provided otherwise hereinafter, any reference to “section,” “subsection” or “subdivision” means all, or such portion of, T.C.A. § 35-15-404.

The provisions of this section in some ways diverge significantly from the Uniform Trust Code and the restatements. To the extent this section is in conflict with the Uniform Trust Code, any restatement or any other foreign law, such foreign law is not precedential or controlling and is rejected by the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code.

This section requires that the purposes of a trust be lawful and possible to achieve. It also requires that a trust and its terms be for the benefit of its beneficiaries.

Unlike the Uniform Trust Code and the restatements, this section does not contain a prohibition of purposes “contrary to public policy.” The Tennessee Uniform Trust Code recognizes that some purposes may be so noxious as to truly offend public policy. However, the existence of an offense rising to such level should not be easily found, and under the Tennessee trust statutes such existence is likely more difficult to find than under the Uniform Trust Code, some other jurisdictions’ laws and the various restatements. This view is in keeping with primary objectives of the Tennessee trust statutes that a settlor’s intent be the lodestar by which a trust is interpreted, that such intent be carried out and that settlors have the freedom to dispose of their assets to whom and in the manner they wish, all to the greatest extent constitutionally allowable, as provided by T.C.A. § 35-15-105.

Moreover, unlike under the Uniform Trust Code, T.C.A. § 35-15-105 requires that a determination of whether a trust and its terms are “for the benefit of its beneficiaries,” be made solely considering how such “interests of such beneficiaries are defined under the terms of the trust .” [emphasis added]

Pursuant to T.C.A. § 35-15-402, a trust must have an identifiable beneficiary unless the trust is of a type that does not have beneficiaries in the usual sense, such as a charitable trust or, as provided in T.C.A. §§ 35-15-408 and 35-15-409, trusts for the care of an animal or other valid noncharitable purpose. The general purpose of trusts having identifiable beneficiaries is to benefit those beneficiaries in accordance with their interests as such interest is defined in the terms of the trust.

While a settlor has considerable latitude in specifying how a particular trust purpose is to be pursued, the administrative and other nondispositive trust terms must reasonably relate to this purpose and not divert the trust property to achieve a trust purpose that is invalid, such as one which is frivolous or capricious.

The provision of T.C.A. § 35-15-412 that allows the court to modify administrative terms that are impracticable, wasteful (but relative to the use in this section of the word “wasteful,” see the interpretation given to such word in the section comment to T.C.A. § 35-15-412, resulting in such word being interpreted to mean “obsolete or ineffective,” such interpretation arguably being applicable to this section as well), or impair the trust’s administration, is a specific application of the requirement that a trust and its terms be for the benefit of the beneficiaries as the interests of such beneficiaries are defined in the terms of the trust. The fact that it is determined that a settlor suggests or directs an unlawful or other inappropriate means for performing a trust does not invalidate the trust if the trust has a substantial purpose that can be achieved by other methods. See Restatement (Third) of Trusts § 28 cmt. e (Tentative Draft No. 2, approved 1999).

Persons interpreting T.C.A. §§ 35-15-412 and 35-15-413 to examine if the terms meet the standards therein for modification or termination are directed to this section, T.C.A. §§ 35-15-105, as well as the overriding emphasis of the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code on settlor’s intent and freedom of disposition. In all of the above ways, the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code diverges significantly from the Uniform Trust Code and from certain portions of the restatements. In all such cases of divergence, Tennessee law controls.

If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before July 1, 2013, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.

35-15-405. Charitable purposes — Enforcement.

A charitable trust may be created for the relief of poverty, the advancement of education or religion, the promotion of health, governmental or municipal purposes, or other purposes the achievement of which is beneficial to the community.

If the terms of a charitable trust do not indicate a particular charitable purpose or beneficiary, the court may select one (1) or more charitable purposes or beneficiaries. The selection must be consistent with the settlor's intention to the extent it can be ascertained.

The settlor of a charitable trust, among others, may maintain a proceeding to enforce the trust.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 27.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence. 6 Tenn. Juris., Charities, §§ 11, 22.

35-15-406. Creation of trust induced by fraud, duress, or undue influence.

A trust is void to the extent its creation was induced by fraud, duress, or undue influence.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 28.

35-15-407. Evidence of oral trust.

Except as required by a statute other than this chapter, a trust need not be evidenced by a trust instrument, but the creation of an oral trust and its terms may be established only by clear and convincing evidence.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 29.

35-15-408. Trust for care of animal.

A trust may be created to provide for the care of an animal alive during the settlor's lifetime. The trust terminates upon the death of the animal or, if the trust was created to provide for the care of more than one (1) animal alive during the settlor's lifetime, upon the death of the last surviving animal. The trust may not be enforced for more than ninety (90) years.

A trust authorized by this section may be enforced by any of the following who are appointed under the terms of a trust: a trustee, trust advisor, trust protector or other person or, if no person is so appointed, by a person appointed by the court. In addition, a person having an interest in the welfare of the animal may request the court to appoint a person to enforce the trust or to remove a person appointed.

Property of a trust authorized by this section may be applied only to its intended use, except to the extent the court determines that the value of the trust property exceeds the amount required for the intended use. Except as otherwise provided in the terms of the trust, property not required for the intended use must be distributed to the settlor, if then living, otherwise to the settlor's successors in interest.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 30; 2007, ch. 24, § 13; 2013, ch. 390, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 390, § 55 provided that: (b) Except as otherwise provided in the act, on July 1, 2013:

The act applies to all trusts created before, on, or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to all judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced on or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced before July 1, 2013, unless the court finds that application of a particular provision of the act would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceedings or prejudice the rights of the parties, in which case the particular provision of the act does not apply and the superseded law applies;

Any rule of construction or presumption provided in the act applies to trust instruments executed before July 1, 2013, unless there is a clear and express indication of a contrary intent in the terms of the trust; and

An act done before July 1, 2013, is not affected by the act.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence. 6 Tenn. Juris., Charities, §§ 5, 8, 11.

Section Comment.

If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before July 1, 2013, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.

35-15-409. Noncharitable trust without ascertainable beneficiary.

Except as otherwise provided in § 35-15-408 or by another statute, the following rules apply:

A trust may be created for a noncharitable purpose without a definite or definitely ascertainable beneficiary or for a noncharitable but otherwise valid purpose to be selected by the trustee. The trust may not be enforced for more than ninety (90) years;

A trust authorized by this section may be enforced by any of the following who are appointed under the terms of a trust: a trustee, trust advisor, trust protector or other person; or if no person is so appointed, by a person appointed by the court; and

Property of a trust authorized by this section may be applied only to its intended use, except to the extent the court determines that the value of the trust property exceeds the amount required for the intended use. Except as otherwise provided in the terms of the trust, property not required for the intended use must be distributed to the settlor, if then living, otherwise to the settlor's successors in interest.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 31; 2007, ch. 24, § 14; 2013, ch. 390, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 390, § 55 provided that: (b) Except as otherwise provided in the act, on July 1, 2013:

The act applies to all trusts created before, on, or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to all judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced on or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced before July 1, 2013, unless the court finds that application of a particular provision of the act would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceedings or prejudice the rights of the parties, in which case the particular provision of the act does not apply and the superseded law applies;

Any rule of construction or presumption provided in the act applies to trust instruments executed before July 1, 2013, unless there is a clear and express indication of a contrary intent in the terms of the trust; and

An act done before July 1, 2013, is not affected by the act.

Section Comment.

If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before July 1, 2013, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.

35-15-410. Modification or termination of trust — Proceedings for approval or disapproval.

In addition to the methods of termination prescribed by §§ 35-15-411 — 35-15-414, a trust terminates to the extent the trust is revoked or expires pursuant to its terms, no purpose of the trust remains to be achieved, or the purposes of the trust have become unlawful or impossible to achieve.

A proceeding to approve or disapprove a proposed modification or termination under §§ 35-15-411 — 35-15-416, or trust combination or division under § 35-15-417, may be commenced by a trustee or beneficiary. The settlor of a charitable trust may maintain a proceeding to modify the trust under § 35-15-413.

Nothing in this section or this chapter is intended to create or imply a duty for a trustee to make or seek approval of a modification, termination, combination or division, and a trustee is not liable for not making or seeking approval of a modification, termination, combination or division.

No modification, termination, combination or division may be made pursuant to §§ 35-15-411 — 35-15-417 that:

Results in the trust not qualifying for the federal or state marital or charitable income, gift, estate or inheritance tax deduction if the trust would qualify but for the modification, termination, combination or division;

Results in the trust being subject to the federal or state generation-skipping transfer tax if the trust would not be subject to the generation-skipping transfer tax but for the modification, termination, combination or division; or

Results in an overall increase in federal or state estate, inheritance, gift or generation-skipping transfer taxes.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 32; 2013, ch. 390, § 51.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 390, § 55 provided that: (b) Except as otherwise provided in the act, on July 1, 2013:

The act applies to all trusts created before, on, or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to all judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced on or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced before July 1, 2013, unless the court finds that application of a particular provision of the act would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceedings or prejudice the rights of the parties, in which case the particular provision of the act does not apply and the superseded law applies;

Any rule of construction or presumption provided in the act applies to trust instruments executed before July 1, 2013, unless there is a clear and express indication of a contrary intent in the terms of the trust; and

An act done before July 1, 2013, is not affected by the act.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Uniform Trust Code: New Formulation for a Trusty Tool (Marshall H. Peterson), 41 No. 1 Tenn. B.J. 24 (2005).

1. Suit to Disapprove Proposal.
2. Trustee Duties.

Co-trustee sought a declaration that the settlement, which sought termination of the trust, violated the Tennessee Uniform Trust Act and, as such, should not be enforced; in short, the co-trustee filed a suit to disapprove a proposed termination of the trust. Miller v. Maples, — S.W.3d —, 2018 Tenn. App. LEXIS 697 (Tenn. Ct. App. Nov. 30, 2018).

Tennessee Uniform Trust Act contains no requirement that the trustee specifically request approval of termination or modification of the trust; rather, the trustee need only commence a proceeding to approve or disapprove a proposed modification or termination. Miller v. Maples, — S.W.3d —, 2018 Tenn. App. LEXIS 697 (Tenn. Ct. App. Nov. 30, 2018).

Unless provided otherwise hereinafter, any reference to “section,” “subsection” or “subdivision” means all, or such portion of, T.C.A. § 35-15-410.

The provisions of this section in some ways diverge significantly from the Uniform Trust Code and the restatements. To the extent this section is in conflict with the Uniform Trust Code, any restatement or any other foreign law, such foreign law is not precedential or controlling and is rejected by the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code.

Terminations under subsection (a) may be in either in whole or in part.

Note that unlike Uniform Trust Code section 410:

If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before July 1, 2013, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.

35-15-411. Modification or termination of noncharitable irrevocable trust by consent.

During the settlor's lifetime, a noncharitable irrevocable trust may be modified or terminated by the trustee upon consent of all qualified beneficiaries, even if the modification or termination is inconsistent with a material purpose of the trust if the settlor does not object to the proposed modification or termination. The trustee shall notify the settlor of the proposed modification or termination not less than sixty (60) days before initiating the modification or termination. The notice of modification or termination must include:

An explanation of the reasons for the proposed modification or termination;

The date on which the proposed modification or termination is anticipated to occur; and

The date, not less than sixty (60) days after the giving of the notice, by which the settlor must notify the trustee of an objection to the proposed modification or termination.

Following the settlor's death, a noncharitable irrevocable trust may be terminated upon consent of all of the qualified beneficiaries if the court concludes that continuance of the trust is not necessary to achieve any material purpose of the trust.

Following the settlor's death, a noncharitable irrevocable trust may be modified upon the unanimous agreement of the trustee and all qualified beneficiaries as provided under § 35-15-111 if such modification does not violate a material purpose of the trust. Additionally, a noncharitable irrevocable trust may be modified upon consent of all of the qualified beneficiaries if the court concludes that modification is not inconsistent with a material purpose of the trust.

Modification of a trust as authorized in this section is not prohibited by a spendthrift clause or by a provision in the trust instrument that prohibits amendment or revocation of the trust.

An agreement to modify a trust as authorized by this section is binding on a beneficiary whose interest is represented by another person under part 3 of this chapter.

Upon termination of a trust under subsection (a) or (b), the trustee shall distribute the trust property as agreed by the qualified beneficiaries.

If not all of the qualified beneficiaries consent to a proposed modification or termination of the trust under subsection (a), (b), or (c), as applicable, the modification or termination may be approved by the court if the court is satisfied that:

If all of the qualified beneficiaries had consented, the trust could have been modified or terminated under this section; and

The interests of a qualified beneficiary who does not consent will be adequately protected.

As used in this section, “noncharitable irrevocable trust” refers to a trust that is not revocable by the settlor with respect to which:

No federal or state income, gift, estate, or inheritance tax charitable deduction was allowed upon transfers to the trust; and

The value of all interests in the trust owned by charitable organizations does not exceed five percent (5%) of the value of the trust.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), (b), or (c), the trustee may seek court approval of a modification or termination.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 33; 2007, ch. 24, §§ 15-19; 2019, ch. 340, § 14.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment redesignated the former second sentence of (b) as present (c), added present (d) and (e) and redesignated former (c)-(f) as present (f)-(i); in present (c), added the first sentence and added “Additionally,” at the beginning of the second sentence; substituted “subsection (a), (b), or (c), as applicable,” for “subsection (a) or (b)” in the introductory language of present (g); substituted “As used in this section” for “Solely for purposes of this section, the term” at the beginning of present (h); and substituted “subsection (a), (b), or (c), “ for “subsection (a)” in present (i).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 340, § 20. May 10, 2019.

Law Reviews.

Where There's a Will: Something Old, Something New, Something Borrowed, Something Blue: Estate Planning Tools Married To New Realities (Eddy R. Smith), 49 Tenn. B.J. 32 (2013).

Where There's a Will: The Report of My Practice's Death Was an Exaggeration: The Healthy Prognosis for Estate Planning in Tennessee (Eddy R. Smith), 48 Tenn. B.J. 32 (2012).

35-15-412. Modification or termination because of unanticipated circumstances or inability to administer trust effectively.

The court may modify the administrative or dispositive terms of a trust or terminate the trust if, because of circumstances not anticipated by the settlor, modification or termination will further the purposes of the trust. To the extent practicable, the modification must be made in accordance with the settlor's probable intention.

The court may modify the administrative terms of a trust if continuation of the trust on its existing terms would be impracticable or wasteful or impair the trust's administration.

Upon termination of a trust under this section, the trustee shall distribute the trust property in a manner consistent with the purposes of the trust.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 34.

35-15-413. Cy pres.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), if a particular charitable purpose becomes unlawful, impracticable, impossible to achieve, obsolete or ineffective:

The trust does not fail, in whole or in part;

The trust property does not revert to the settlor or the settlor’s successors in interest; and

The court may apply cy pres to modify or terminate the trust by directing that the trust property be applied or distributed, in whole or in part, in a manner that fulfills as nearly as possible the settlor’s charitable intent and purposes.

A provision in the terms of a charitable trust that would result in distribution of the trust property to a noncharitable beneficiary prevails over the power of the court under subsection (a) to apply cy pres to modify or terminate the trust only if, when the provision takes effect:

The trust property is to revert to the settlor and the settlor is still living; or

Fewer than twenty-one (21) years have elapsed since the date of the trust’s creation.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 35; 2013, ch. 390, §§ 13, 14.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 390, § 55 provided that: (b) Except as otherwise provided in the act, on July 1, 2013:

The act applies to all trusts created before, on, or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to all judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced on or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced before July 1, 2013, unless the court finds that application of a particular provision of the act would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceedings or prejudice the rights of the parties, in which case the particular provision of the act does not apply and the superseded law applies;

Any rule of construction or presumption provided in the act applies to trust instruments executed before July 1, 2013, unless there is a clear and express indication of a contrary intent in the terms of the trust; and

An act done before July 1, 2013, is not affected by the act.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence. 6 Tenn. Juris., Charities, §§ 4, 5.

Section Comment.

Unless provided otherwise hereinafter, any reference to “section,” “subsection” or “subdivision” means all, or such portion of, T.C.A. § 35-15-413.

The provisions of this section in some ways diverge from the Uniform Trust Code and the restatements. To the ex-tent this section is in conflict with the Uniform Trust Code, any restatement or any other foreign law, such foreign law is not precedential or controlling and is rejected by the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code.

Subsection (a) codifies the court's inherent authority to apply cy pres. The power may be applied to modify an administrative or dispositive term. The court may order the trust terminated and distributed to other charitable entities. Partial termination may also be ordered if the trust property is more than sufficient to satisfy the trust's current purposes. Subsection (a), which is similar to Restatement (Third) of Trusts § 67 (Tentative Draft No. 3, approved 2001), modifies the doctrine of cy pres by presuming that the settlor had a general charitable intent when a particular charitable purpose becomes impossible or impracticable to achieve. Traditional doctrine did not supply that presumption, leaving it to the courts to determine whether the settlor had a general charitable intent. If such an intent is found, the trust property is applied to other charitable purposes. If not, the charitable trust fails. See Restatement (Second) of Trusts § 399 (1959). In the great majority of cases the settlor would prefer that the property be used for other charitable purposes. Courts are usually able to find an appropriate charitable purpose to which to apply the property, no matter how vaguely such purpose may have been expressed by the settlor.

In keeping with the primary objectives of the Tennessee trust statutes that a settlor’s intent be the lodestar by which a trust is interpreted, that such intent be carried out and that settlors have the freedom to dispose of their assets to whom and in the manner they wish, all to the greatest extent constitutionally allowable, subsection (a) states if the particular purpose for which the trust was created becomes impracticable, unlawful, impossible to achieve, obsolete or ineffective, the trust does not fail. The court instead must either: (a) modify the terms of the trust; or (b) distribute the property of the trust; in either case in a manner that fulfills as nearly as possible the settlor's charitable intent and purposes.

Unlike in the Uniform Trust Code and the Restatement (Third) of Trusts, subsection (a) of this section does not contain the word “wasteful,” and substitutes the words “obsolete or ineffective” as grounds for modification or termination because the word “wasteful” is believed to be too vague and subject to too broad of interpretation.

Also unlike the Uniform Trust Code, which only requires that the manner of any modification or termination be “consistent with the settlor’s charitable purposes,” subsection (a) requires that any such modification or termination be effected in a manner “that fulfills as nearly as possible the settlor’s intent and purposes.” The Tennessee Uniform Trust Code believes that such requirement of subsection (a) is far less likely to effect a modification or termination that strays from a settlor’s intent and purposes and therefore results in favoring some watered down, vague and general, charitable purpose.

The settlor, with one exception, may mandate that the trust property pass to a noncharitable beneficiary upon failure of a particular charitable purpose (as such is defined in subsection (a) of this section). Responding to concerns about the clogging of title and other administrative problems caused by remote default provisions upon failure of a charitable purpose (as such is defined in subsection (a) of this section), subsection (b) invalidates a gift over to a noncharitable beneficiary upon such failure unless the trust property is to revert to a still living settlor or fewer than 21 years have elapsed since the trust's creation. Subsection (b) will not apply to a charitable lead trust, under which a charity receives payments for a term certain with a remainder to a noncharity. In the case of a charitable lead trust, the settlor's particular charitable purpose does not fail upon completion of the specified trust term and distribution of the remainder to the noncharity. Upon completion of the specified trust term, the settlor's particular charitable purpose has instead been fulfilled. For a discussion of the reasons for a provision such as subsection (b), see Ronald Chester, Cy Pres of Gift Over: The Search for Coherence in Judicial Reform of Failed Charitable Trusts, 23 Suffolk U. L. Rev. 41 (1989).

The doctrine of cy pres is applied not only to trusts, but also to other types of charitable dispositions, including those to charitable corporations. This section does not control dispositions made in nontrust form. However, in formulating rules for such dispositions, the courts often refer to the principles governing charitable trusts, which would include the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code.

For the definition of charitable purpose, see T.C.A. § 35-15-405.

Pursuant to T.C.A. §§ 35-15-405 and 35-15-410, a petition requesting a court to enforce a charitable trust or to apply cy pres may be maintained by a settlor. Under the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code, such action can also be maintained by a cotrustee, the Tennessee attorney general, or by a person having a special interest in the charitable disposition. See Restatement (Second) of Trusts § 391 (1959). Moreover, under the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code, such action can also be maintained by a trust advisor or trust protector, if either holds the power to do so.

If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before July 1, 2013, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.

35-15-414. Modification or termination of uneconomic trust.

After notice to the qualified beneficiaries, the trustee of a trust consisting of trust property having either a total value less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or for which the trustee's annual fee for administering the trust, as set forth in the trustee's published fee schedule, is five percent (5%) or more of the market value of the principal assets of the trust as of the last day of the preceding trust accounting year or the present market value of the principal assets of the trust if there is no applicable trust accounting for a preceding year may terminate the trust if the trustee concludes that the value of the trust property is insufficient to justify the cost of administration.

The court may modify or terminate a trust or remove the trustee and appoint a different trustee if it determines that the value of the trust property is insufficient to justify the cost of administration.

Upon the termination of a trust under this section, the trustee shall distribute the trust property to or for the benefit of the beneficiaries, in such shares as the trustee, or the court if a court proceeding, determines, after taking into account the interests of income and remainder beneficiaries so as to conform as nearly as possible to the intention of the settlor, but a trust that qualified for the marital deduction for tax purposes shall only be distributed to the spouse of the settlor for whom the trust was created.

This section does not apply to an easement for conservation or preservation.

This section shall not limit the right of a trustee, acting alone, to terminate a trust in accordance with applicable provisions of the governing instrument.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 36; 2019, ch. 340, § 15.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment rewrote (a) which read: “After notice to the qualified beneficiaries, the trustee of a trust consisting of trust property having a total value less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) may terminate the trust if the trustee concludes that the value of the trust property is insufficient to justify the cost of administration.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 340, § 20. May 10, 2019.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence. 6 Tenn. Juris., Charities, §§ 5, 17.

35-15-415. Reformation to correct mistakes.

The court may reform the terms of a trust, even if unambiguous, to conform the terms to the settlor's intention if it is proved by clear and convincing evidence that both the settlor's intent and the terms of the trust were affected by a mistake of fact or law, whether in expression or inducement.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 37.

35-15-416. Modification to achieve settlor's tax objectives.

To achieve the settlor's tax objectives, the court may modify the terms of a trust in a manner that is not contrary to the settlor's probable intention. The court may provide that the modification has retroactive effect.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 38.

35-15-417. Combination and division of trusts.

After notice to the qualified beneficiaries, a trustee may combine two (2) or more trusts into a single trust or divide a trust into two (2) or more separate trusts, if the result does not impair rights of any beneficiary or adversely affect the achievement of the purposes of the trust. If the trusts to be combined or divided have different trustees, the trustees may negotiate the terms of the combined or divided trusts, including which trust or trusts will be the surviving trust or trusts, who will be the trustee or trustees of the surviving trust or trusts and any other matter relating to the operation of the surviving trust or trusts.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 39; 2007, ch. 24, § 20.